Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8153.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-18 of the General Laws entitled "Payments to Fire Companies"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-18-4. Payments to Exeter fire and rescue service.
The Exeter Volunteer Fire Department No. 1 and Exeter Volunteer Fire Company 2, as
well as services provided by the Exeter ambulance transport, EMT intermediate, and paramedic
care, shall be reimbursed by the state for seventy-five percent (75%) of the costs for any calls made
on state property.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005689
========